Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Declaration of Death.

Collateral references. —

22A Am. Jur. 2d, Death, §§ 384-402.

25A C.J.S., Death, § 1 et seq.

Presumption of death of former spouse in favor of validity of second marriage, 14 ALR2d 20, 41, 49.

Proof of death in case of disappearance of insured, 26 ALR2d 1073.

Necessity and sufficiency of showing of search and inquiry by one relying on presumption of death from 7 years’ absence, 99 ALR2d 307.

Sec. 09.55.020.
Petition and inquiry.

If a petition is presented by an interested person to a district judge or magistrate alleging that a designated person has disappeared and after diligent search cannot be found, and if it appears to the satisfaction of the judge or magistrate that the circumstances surrounding the disappearance afford reasonable grounds for the belief that the person has suffered death from accidental or other violent means, the judge or magistrate shall summon and impanel a jury of six qualified persons to inquire into the facts surrounding and the presumption to be raised from the disappearance.
If no one submits a petition within 40 days, a judge or magistrate may submit the petition from personal knowledge of the case.

History.

(§ 11.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.55.030.
Verdict and entry of order.

If the jury by their unanimous verdict in writing find that sufficient evidence has been presented to them from which it fairly may be presumed that the missing person has met death, and if the judge or magistrate approves the finding, then, after a period of six months has elapsed, the person shall be presumed to be dead and the judge or magistrate shall enter an order to that effect. However, in cases where there is clear and convincing evidence of the presumed death the judge or magistrate may sooner enter the order.

History.

(§ 11.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966)

Sec. 09.55.040.
Compensation and expenses allowed.

The members of the jury and witnesses are entitled to the same compensation as in civil actions in a district court, and the compensation and other incidental expenses shall be audited and allowed as in the case of other similar expenses.

History.

(§ 11.03 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 33 SLA 1999)

Legislative history reports. —

For the purpose of the amendment made to this section by
ch. 33, SLA 1999, (CSSB 42(JUD)), see 1999 Senate Journal Supp. No. 5.

Sec. 09.55.050.
Effect of presumptive death certificate.

After the judge or magistrate has entered an order declaring that the person is presumed to be dead either under AS

09.55.020

—

09.55.060

or under the laws dealing with missing persons, the judge or magistrate shall make out and sign a certificate entitled “Presumptive Death Certificate” in the form and manner and containing the information required by the Bureau of Vital Statistics. In addition to the information required by the Bureau of Vital Statistics, the certificate must contain the decedent’s social security number, if ascertainable. The certificate shall be recorded by the judge or magistrate and then filed with the Bureau of Vital Statistics. Upon the entry of the order and the recording and filing of the “Presumptive Death Certificate” as herein provided, the missing person is presumed to be dead, and the person’s estate may be administered in accordance with the then existing provisions of law applicable to the administration of the estates of deceased persons.

History.

(§ 11.04 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 12 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For presumptions and other evidence of death regarding missing persons, see AS

13.06.035

.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendments to this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which were to take effect July 1, 2001, were repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sections 4, and 17, ch. 54, SLA 2001, which were to amend this section effective July 1, 2003, were repealed by § 3, ch. 37, SLA 2003.

Sec. 09.55.060.
Correction or removal of presumptive certificates.

The Bureau of Vital Statistics shall make provisions for the correction, substitution, or removal of the certificates where the body of the person is later found, where additional facts are brought to light, or where the person is later discovered to be alive.

History.

(§ 11.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)